Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-418
Permits for scientific, educational, or private wildlife management purposes; when granted.

Permits may be granted by the commission to any properly accredited person to take and collect for strictly scientific, educational, or private wildlife management purposes any of the fauna hereby protected and their nests, eggs, and spawn. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section, including, but not limited to, requirements relating to applications, eligibility, species which may be taken, methods of taking, and reporting.

Laws 1929, c. 112, II, § 9, p. 411;

C.S.1929, § 37-209;

R.S.1943, § 37-209;

Laws 1967, c. 217, § 1, p. 592;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-209;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 128;

Laws 2001, LB 130, § 2.